Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-660
Franchise to operate utility; terms and conditions; rates prescribed.

All franchises granted by a city or village to any such district, to operate such district's electric utility or utilities within the corporate limits of such city or village, may provide the maximum rates that may be charged by such district for furnishing electrical energy to such city or village, or to its inhabitants, during the franchise period. Such franchises shall be granted in the same manner and upon the same terms and conditions as may now or hereafter be provided by law for granting franchises to private corporations by such cities or villages.

Laws 1939, c. 89, § 1, p. 388;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-713;

R.S.1943, § 70-660.